California statutes. Insurance Code
(a) Subject to the limitation in Section 1242, and except for those foreign investments permitted under Section 1192.95, a domestic insurer may acquire foreign investments of substantially the same type as those that an insurer is permitted to acquire pursuant to this code, if, as a result of the acquisition and after giving effect to the investment, both of the following apply:

(1) The aggregate amount of foreign investments then held by the insurer does not exceed:

(A) Twenty percent of admitted assets, for an insurer with admitted assets equal to or in excess of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000).

(B) Five percent of admitted assets, for an insurer with admitted assets less than five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000).

(2) The aggregate amount of foreign investments then held by the insurer in a single foreign jurisdiction does not exceed:

(A) Ten percent of admitted assets, for any foreign jurisdiction that has a sovereign debt rating of SVO 1.

(B) Three percent of admitted assets, for any foreign jurisdiction that has a sovereign debt rating lower than SVO 1.

(b) Subject to the limitations of Section 1242, an insurer may acquire investments denominated in foreign currencies, whether or not they are foreign investments acquired under subdivision (a) of this section, or additional foreign currency exposure as a result of the termination or expiration of a hedging transaction as defined in Section 1211 with respect to investments denominated in a foreign currency, if the following requirements are met:

(1) The aggregate amount of investments then held by an insurer under this subdivision denominated in foreign currencies does not exceed:

(A) Ten percent of admitted assets, for an insurer described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(B) Three percent of admitted assets, for an insurer described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) The aggregate amount of investments then held by an insurer under this subdivision denominated in the foreign currency of a single foreign jurisdiction does not exceed:

(A) Ten percent of admitted assets, for an insurer described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) for a foreign jurisdiction that has a sovereign debt rating of SVO 1 or 3 percent of admitted assets as to any other foreign jurisdiction.

(B) Three percent of admitted assets, for an insurer described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(3) An investment shall not be considered denominated in a foreign currency if the acquiring insurer enters into one or more contracts in transactions permitted under Section 1211 and the business entity counterparty agrees under the contract or contracts to exchange all payments made on the foreign currency denominated investment for United States currency at a rate that effectively insulates the investment cashflows against future changes in currency exchange rates during the period the contract or contracts are in effect.

(c) In addition to investments permitted under subdivisions (a) and (b), a domestic insurer that is authorized to do business in a foreign jurisdiction, and that has outstanding insurance, annuity, or reinsurance contracts on lives or risks resident or located in that foreign jurisdiction and denominated in the foreign currency of that jurisdiction may acquire foreign investments respecting that jurisdiction, subject to the limitations of Section 1242. However, investments made under this subdivision in obligations of foreign governments, their political subdivisions, and government-sponsored enterprises shall not be subject to the limitations of Section 1242 if those investments carry an SVO rating of 1 or 2. The aggregate amount of investments acquired by the insurer shall not exceed the greater of the following:

(1) The amount that the insurer is required by the law of the foreign jurisdiction to invest in the foreign jurisdiction.

(2) One hundred fifteen percent of the amount of the insurer’s reserves, net of reinsurance and other obligations under the contracts.

(d) In addition to investments permitted under subdivisions (a) and (b), an insurer that is not authorized to do business in a foreign jurisdiction, but that has outstanding insurance, annuity, or reinsurance contracts on lives or risks resident or located in that foreign jurisdiction and denominated in the foreign currency of that jurisdiction may acquire foreign investments respecting that jurisdiction, and may acquire investments denominated in the currency of that jurisdiction subject to the limitations of Section 1242. However, investments made under this subdivision in obligations of foreign governments, their political subdivisions, and government-sponsored enterprises shall not be subject to the limitations of Section 1242 if those investments carry an SVO rating of 1 or 2. The aggregate amount of investments acquired by the insurer shall not exceed 105 percent of the amount of the insurer’s reserves, net of reinsurance and other obligations under the contracts on lives or risks resident or located in the foreign jurisdiction.

(e) The investments acquired under this section shall be subject to Sections 1200, 1201, and 1202.

(f) Nothing in this section shall in any way restrict or limit Canadian investments otherwise permitted by this code. Canadian investments acquired under other sections of this code shall not be considered foreign investments for purposes of the limitations set forth in this section.

(g) Investments made pursuant to Section 1192.9 in investment companies shall be governed by this article to the extent specified in Section 1192.9.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 129, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1241.1.

(a) No domestic insurer shall acquire any investment respecting a foreign jurisdiction, or any investment denominated in the currency of that foreign jurisdiction, if that jurisdiction is designated as a state sponsor of terrorism by the United States Secretary of State pursuant to Section 6(j) of the Export Administration Act, Section 40 of the Arms Export Control Act, and Section 620A of the Foreign Assistance Act.

(b) If any investment made pursuant to Section 1241 later becomes prohibited by this section, that investment shall not be retained as an investment made pursuant to this code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 129, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1241.2.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The federal Securities and Exchange Commission has determined that business activities in foreign states sponsoring terrorism, such as Iran, that are subject to sanctions by the United States may materially harm the share value of foreign companies. Shares in these foreign companies may be held in the portfolio of insurance companies issuing policies to California consumers.

(2) Publicly traded companies in the United States are substantially restricted in doing business
 in or with foreign states, such as Iran, that the United States Department of State has identified as sponsoring terrorism.

(3) Identifying companies with business activities in foreign states, such as Iran, that sponsor terrorism and ensuring that those investments are financially sound is an important public policy priority.

(4) It is the government of Iran, and not the people of Iran, that is responsible for Iran’s support of terrorism and that commits egregious violations of human rights under which its own citizens are required to live.

(b) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Business operations” means maintaining,
 selling, or leasing equipment, facilities, personnel, or any other apparatus of business or commerce in Iran, including the ownership or possession of real or personal property located in Iran.

(2) “Company” means a sole proprietorship, organization, association, corporation, partnership, venture, or other entity, its subsidiary or affiliate that exists for profitmaking purposes or to otherwise secure economic advantage. “Company” also means a company owned or controlled, either directly or indirectly, by the government of Iran, that is established or organized under the laws of or has its principal place of business in the Islamic Republic of Iran.

(3) “Government of Iran” means the government of Iran or its instrumentalities or political subdivisions. “Government of Iran” also
 means an individual, company, or public agency located in Iran that provides material or financial support to the Islamic Republic of Iran.

(4) “Invest” or “investment” means the purchase, ownership, or control of stock of a company, association, or corporation, the capital stock of a mutual water company or corporation, bonds issued by the government or a political subdivision of Iran, corporate bonds or other debt instruments issued by a company, or the commitment of funds or other assets to a company, including a loan or extension of credit to that company.

(5) “Iran” means the Islamic Republic of Iran or a territory under the administration or control of Iran.

(c) (1) Investments by a domestic
 insurer included on the list of companies by the Department of General Services pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2203 of the Public Contract Code shall be treated as nonadmitted assets. Utilization of this list by a domestic insurer to review its investments shall be deemed automatic compliance by the department.

(2) On or before June 30, 2013, and annually thereafter, the insurer shall determine what investments it has in companies included on the Department of General Services list.

(d) The insurer shall provide the department, on an annual basis,
 a list of investments the insurer has in companies included
 on the Department of General Services list described in subdivision (c), including, but not limited to, the issuer, by name, of the stock, bonds, securities, and other evidence of indebtedness.

(e) If the insurer sells or transfers all of its investments in companies included on the Department of General Services list described in subdivision (c), this section shall not apply to that insurer.

(f) This section shall cease to be operative if both of the following
 apply:

(1) Iran is removed from the United States Department of State’s list of countries that have been determined to repeatedly provide support for acts of international terrorism.

(2) Pursuant to the appropriate federal statute, the President of the United States determines and certifies to the appropriate committee of the Congress of the United States that Iran has ceased its efforts to design, develop, manufacture, or acquire a nuclear explosive device or related materials and technology.

(g) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid
 provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 479, Sec. 1.   (AB 2160)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (f).)
-------------------------------------------

1242.

(a) (1) Except as otherwise specified in Section 1241, a domestic insurer shall not acquire directly or indirectly through an investment subsidiary, an investment under Section 1241 if, as a result of and after giving effect to the investment, the insurer would hold more than 3 percent of its admitted assets in investments of all kinds issued, assumed, accepted, insured, or guaranteed by a single person, or 5 percent of its admitted assets in investments in the voting securities of a depository institution or any company that controls the institution.

(2) The 3 percent limitation in paragraph (1) shall not apply to the aggregate amounts insured by a single financial guaranty insurer with the highest generic rating issued by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization.

(b) A domestic insurer shall not acquire, directly or indirectly through an investment subsidiary, an investment under Section 1241 if, as a result of and after giving effect to the investment, the insurer’s aggregate medium and lower grade investments do not comply with the limitations of Section 1196.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 129, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Valuation of Investments [1250. - 1254.]

1250.

When any domestic incorporated insurer has, pursuant to the laws of this State, invested any of its funds in purchases of, or loans upon, the stock or obligations of a corporation or of a nation, state, or political or municipal division of a state, if the commissioner has reason to believe that such stock or obligations are not amply secured or are not yielding an income, he may direct the insurer to report to him under oath the amount of the stock or obligation, the security therefor and its market value.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1251.

A stock, bond or other evidence of debt if in default as to principal or interest, or if not amply secured, shall not be valued as an asset of the insurer above its market value.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1252.

All bonds or other evidences of debt held by an admitted incorporated insurer if amply secured and if not in default as to principal or interest may, in the discretion of the commissioner, be valued as follows:

(a) If purchased at par, at the par value.

(b) If purchased above or below par, on the basis of the purchase price adjusted so as to bring the value to par at maturity and so as to yield the effective rate of interest on the price at which the purchase was made.

(c) In such valuation, the purchase price shall in no case be taken at a higher figure than the actual market value at the time of purchase.

The commissioner shall have full discretion in determining the method of calculating values according to the foregoing rule, the values found by him in accordance with such method being final and binding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.

Any such insurer may report such bonds or other evidence of debt at market value or book value, but in no event at an aggregate value exceeding the aggregate of the values calculated according to the rule prescribed by section 1252.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1254.

Any asset of an insurer which is found by the commissioner to be insolvent or threatened with insolvency shall be reduced in value, if necessary, to reflect its proper value.

Where the asset is subject to an offset or lien which the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe is about to be exercised or enforced, the commissioner may require that the asset and the liability which gives rise to the offset or lien be reduced proportionately.

The commissioner shall grant a hearing to establish the value of an asset upon written demand of the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1614.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Reinsurance Transactions [1260. - 1260.]

1260.

Incorporated insurers or reciprocal insurers who are members of what is commonly known as a “group” or “fleet” may enter into reinsurance transactions between members of the same “group” or “fleet” unless otherwise specifically prohibited by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 451.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Reciprocal Insurers [1280. - 1560.19.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1280. - 1284.]

1280.

This chapter shall not in any way affect the rights, duties, or obligations of members of or subscribers at any reciprocal or interinsurance exchange which has been adjudged insolvent and ordered to be liquidated prior to the date this code takes effect. All such rights, duties, or obligations shall be governed by the law applicable thereto prior to such date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1280.5.

This chapter and the other provisions of this code shall not apply to nor affect unincorporated interindemnity or reciprocal or interinsurance contracts between members of, or persons marketing their products through, nonprofit cooperative marketing associations organized and operating under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11701) of Division 6 of the Food and Agricultural Code which indemnify solely in respect to losses to those members or persons from damage to, or destruction of, crops in process of handling or marketing, or facilities at a fixed location for processing, handling or marketing the crops, and which do not collect in advance of loss
 moneys other than for necessary expense of administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 101.)
-------------------------------------------

1280.7.

(a) This chapter and the other provisions of this code, except as set forth in this paragraph, shall not apply to or affect unincorporated interindemnity or reciprocal or interinsurance contracts between members of a cooperative corporation, organized and operating under Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, whose members consist solely of physicians and surgeons licensed in California, which contracts indemnify solely in respect to medical malpractice claims against those members, and which do not collect in advance of loss any moneys other than contributions by each member to a collective reserve trust fund or for necessary expenses of administration. However, interindemnity, reciprocal, or interinsurance
 contracts with respect to the following types of claims, in addition to medical malpractice claims, may be entered into in conjunction with contracts with respect to medical malpractice claims if the reserve trust fund is at least twenty million dollars ($20,000,000):

(1) Bodily injury or property damage arising out of the conduct and of the operations of the member’s professional practice occurring on the member’s premises.

(2) Officers’, directors’, and administrators’ liability, to the extent that the member’s professional practice is operated as a professional corporation or group.

(3) Nonowned automobile coverage.

The provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 330) of Part
 1 of Division 1 shall apply to unincorporated interindemnity or reciprocal or interinsurance contracts. Those unincorporated interindemnity or reciprocal or interinsurance contracts shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(b) Each participating member shall enter into and, concurrently therewith, receive an executed copy of a trust agreement, which shall govern the collection and disposition of all funds of the interindemnity arrangement.

The trust agreement shall, at a minimum, contain provision for all the following matters:

(1) An initial trust corpus of not less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000), which corpus shall be a trust fund to secure enforcement of the interindemnity arrangement. The average contribution to
 the initial trust corpus shall be not less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per member participating in the interindemnity arrangement. The average contribution to the trust fund shall continue at all times to be not less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per participating member unless the interindemnity arrangement is qualified to admit members under the terms of subdivision (k). No such interindemnity arrangement shall become operative until the requisite minimum reserve trust fund has been established by contributions from not fewer than 500 participating members.

(2) The reserve trust fund created by the trust agreement shall be administered by a board of trustees of three or more members, all of whom shall be physicians and surgeons licensed in California, participating members in the interindemnity arrangement, and elected
 biennially or more frequently by at least a majority of all members participating in the interindemnity arrangement.

(3) The members of the board of trustees are fiduciaries and the board shall be the custodian of all funds of the interindemnity arrangement, and all those funds shall be deposited in the bank or banks and savings and loan associations in California as the board may designate. Each account shall require two or more signatories for withdrawal of funds in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The authorized signatories shall be appointed by the board and, as to any withdrawal in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), at least one of the two or more authorized signatories shall be a physician and surgeon licensed in California and a participating member in the interindemnity arrangement. Each signatory on those
 accounts shall maintain, at all times while empowered to draw on those funds, for the benefit of the interindemnity arrangement, a bond against loss suffered through embezzlement, mysterious disappearance, holdup or burglary, or other loss issued by a bonding company licensed to do business in California in a penal sum of not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(4) All funds held in trust that are in excess of current financial needs shall be invested and reinvested from time to time, under the direction of the board of trustees, in eligible securities, as defined in Section 16430 of the Government Code, in portfolios of eligible securities, in exchange traded financial futures contracts or exchange traded options contracts to hedge investment in those eligible securities, or in certificates of deposits or time deposits issued
 by banks and savings and loan associations in California duly insured by instrumentalities of the United States government.

Pursuant to the authority contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution, the restrictions upon rates of interest contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution shall not apply to any obligations of, loans made by, or forbearances of, any trust established by a cooperative corporation providing indemnity pursuant to this section.

(5) The income earned on the corpus of the trust fund shall be the source for the payment of the claims, costs, judgments, settlements, and costs of administration contemplated by the interindemnity arrangement, and to the extent the income is insufficient for those purposes, the board of trustees shall have the power
 and authority to assess participating members for all amounts necessary to meet the obligations of the interindemnity arrangement in accordance with the terms thereof. If necessary in the best interests of the interindemnity arrangement, the board of trustees may make assessments to increase the corpus of the trust fund in accordance with the terms of the interindemnity arrangement. Any assessment levied against a member shall be the personal obligation of the member. Any person who obtains a final judgment of recovery for medical malpractice or other liability authorized by this section against a member of the interindemnity
 arrangement shall have, in addition to any other remedy, the right to assert directly all rights to indemnification that the judgment debtor has under the interindemnity arrangement. The final judgment shall be a lien on the reserve trust fund to secure payment of the judgment, limited to the extent of the judgment debtor’s rights to indemnification.

Any change in the assessment agreement between the interindemnity arrangement and its membership shall be submitted to the entire membership for ratification. If the ratification process is to be performed by ballot, a ballot shall be sent to each member by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or by electronic transmission. Within 45 days after the posted date on the ballot, each member who decides to vote on the assessment change shall return their mail or electronic ballot to the interindemnity
 arrangement for the tallying of the ballots. An affirmative vote of 75 percent of those voting shall be required to effectuate any change in the assessment agreement.

If a change in the assessment agreement is to be submitted to members at a properly called meeting, the membership shall be notified of the meeting and the proposed assessment change by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or by electronic transmission at least 45 days prior to the meeting. Seventy-five percent of those present in person or by proxy at the meeting shall be required to effectuate any change in the assessment agreement.

(6) Each participating member shall be covered by the interindemnity arrangement for not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for each occurrence of professional negligence or other liability
 authorized by this section, with the terms and conditions of the coverage to be specified in the trust agreement, except that the interindemnity arrangement may provide participating members with an aggregate limit for all payments on behalf of the member and may provide participating members with less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) of coverage for each occurrence of professional negligence or other liability authorized by this section if the interindemnity arrangement obtains for the benefit of the members reinsurance of excess limits coverage in an amount that when added to the coverage provided by the interindemnity arrangement would equal not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for each occurrence of professional negligence or other liability authorized by this section.

Any change in the coverage provided by the trust agreement between
 the interindemnity arrangement and its membership shall be submitted to the entire membership for ratification. If the ratification process is to be performed by ballot, a ballot shall be sent to each member by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or by electronic transmission. Within 45 days after the posted date on the ballot, each member who decides to vote on the coverage change shall return their mail or electronic ballot to the interindemnity arrangement for the tallying of the ballot. An affirmative vote of 75 percent of those voting shall be required to effectuate any change in the coverage provided by the trust agreement, except that at least 50 percent of the entire membership must agree to any change.

If any change is to be submitted to members at a properly called meeting, the membership shall be notified of the meeting and the proposed coverage
 change by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or by electronic transmission at least 45 days prior to the
 meeting. An affirmative vote of 75 percent of the membership present at the meeting, in person or by proxy, shall be required to effectuate any change, except that at least 50 percent of the entire membership must agree to any change.

(7) Withdrawal of all, or any portion of, the corpus of the reserve trust fund shall be upon the written authorization signed by at least two-thirds of the members of the board of trustees.

(8) The board of trustees shall cause both of the following to be furnished to each member participating in the interindemnity
 arrangement by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or by electronic transmission, and to be filed with the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation:

(A) Within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year, a statement of the assets and liabilities of the interindemnity arrangement as of the end of that year, a statement of the revenue and expenditures of the interindemnity arrangement, and a statement of the changes in corpus of the reserve trust for that year, in each case accompanied by a certificate signed by a firm of independent certified public accountants selected by the board of trustees indicating that the firm has conducted an audit of those statements in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards and indicating the results of the audit.

(B) Within
 45 days after the end of each of the first three quarterly periods of each fiscal year, a statement of the assets and liabilities of the interindemnity arrangement as of the end of the quarterly period, a statement of the revenue and expenditures of the interindemnity arrangement, and a statement of the changes in corpus of the reserve trust for the period, in each case accompanied by a certificate signed by a majority of the members of the board of trustees to the effect that the statements were prepared from the official books and records of the interindemnity arrangement.

(C) In addition to the statements required to be filed pursuant to this paragraph, the board of trustees shall annually file with the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation an authorization for disclosure to the commissioner of all financial records pertaining to
 the interindemnity arrangement. For the purpose of this subparagraph, the authorization for disclosure shall also include the financial records of any association, partnership, or corporation that has management or control of the funds or the operation of the interindemnity arrangement.

(9) The trust agreement shall also provide for all the following:

(A) In the event a participating member who is in full compliance with the trust agreement, including the payment of all outstanding dues and assessments, dies, the initial contribution made by the decedent shall be returned to the member’s estate or designated beneficiary; the indemnity coverage shall continue for the benefit of the decedent’s estate in respect of occurrences during the time the decedent was a participating member; and
 neither the person receiving the repayment of the initial contribution nor the decedent’s estate shall be responsible for any assessments levied following the death of the member.

(B) A participating member who is then in full compliance with the trust agreement and who has reached the age of 65 years and who has retired completely from the practice of medicine may elect to retire from the interindemnity arrangement, in which case the member shall not be responsible for assessments levied following the date notice of retirement is given to the trust. Following that retirement, the indemnity coverage shall continue for the benefit of the member in respect of occurrences prior to the time the member retired from the interindemnity arrangement. That retired member’s initial contribution shall be repaid 10 years from the date the
 notice of retirement is received by the trust, or an earlier date as specified in the trust agreement. The board of trustees may reduce the age for retirement to not less than 55 years subject to all other requirements in this paragraph and any additional requirements deemed necessary by the board.

(C) During any period in which a participating member, who is then in full compliance with the trust agreement, has, in the judgment of the board of trustees, become unable to perform any and every duty of their regular professional occupation, the participating member may request disability status in accordance with the terms of the interindemnity arrangement. During any period of disability status, the member shall not be responsible for assessments levied during the period and, if so provided in the interindemnity arrangement, all indemnity coverage,
 both as to defense and payment of claims, shall terminate as to occurrences arising out of the actions of the participating member during the period of disability status.

(D) In the event a participating member fails to pay any assessment when due, the board of trustees may terminate that person’s membership status if the failure to pay is not cured within 30 days from the date the assessment was due. Upon that termination the former participating member shall not be entitled to the return of all or any part of their initial contribution, and the indemnity coverage shall thereupon terminate as to all claims then pending against that person and in respect to all occurrences prior to the date of that termination of membership. However, in the event the interindemnity arrangement is then providing legal defense services to that person,
 the interindemnity arrangement shall continue to provide those services for a period of 10 days following that termination.

(E) In the event a participating member fails to comply with any provision of the trust agreement (other than a failure to pay assessments when due), the board of trustees may terminate that person’s membership status if the failure to comply is not cured within 60 days from the date the person is notified of the failure, provided that before that membership status may be terminated the person shall be given the right to call for a hearing before the board of trustees (to be held before the expiration of the 60-day period), at which hearing the person shall be given the opportunity to demonstrate to the board of trustees that no failure to comply has occurred or, if it has occurred, that it has been cured. Upon that
 termination, the former participating member shall not be entitled to the return of all or any part of their initial contribution, and the indemnity coverage shall thereupon terminate as to all claims then pending against the person and in respect to all occurrences prior to the date of the termination of membership. However, in the event the interindemnity arrangement is then providing legal defense services to that person, the interindemnity arrangement shall continue to provide those services for a period of 10 days following the termination.

(F) A participating member who is then in full compliance with the trust agreement may elect voluntarily to terminate their membership in the interindemnity arrangement. Upon that voluntary termination, that person may further elect to cease being responsible for future assessments, or to continue to pay
 those assessments until the time as the person’s initial contribution is repaid. In the event the person elects to cease being responsible for future assessments, the indemnity coverage shall thereupon terminate and the person shall either be responsible for their own exposure for acts committed while a participating member in the interindemnity arrangement, or they may request the interindemnity arrangement to purchase or provide, at the cost of the person, coverage for that exposure. The initial contribution of the person shall be repaid on the 10th anniversary of the date the contribution was made. In the event the person elects to continue to be responsible for assessments, the indemnity coverage shall continue in respect of occurrences prior to the date of the voluntary termination, and the initial contribution of the person shall be repaid at the time as the board of trustees is satisfied
 that (i) there are no claims pending against the person in respect of occurrences during the time the person was a participating member, and (ii) the statute of limitations has run on all claims that might be asserted against that person in respect of occurrences during that time. In no event shall that repayment be made earlier than the 10th anniversary of the date the contribution was made.

Any person whose membership in an interindemnity arrangement is involuntarily terminated for failure to pay assessments or who voluntarily terminates that membership and elects to be responsible for their own exposure for acts committed while a participating member, shall not be eligible to become a member of any other interindemnity arrangement for a period of five years after the termination unless, on the effective date of the act which amended this section
 during the 1985–86 Regular Session, the person had on file with the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation a copy of a subscription agreement signifying the person’s agreement to transfer membership or had paid a minimum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to another interindemnity arrangement that was granted a permit to organize prior to January 1, 1985.

(G) The board of trustees shall have the right to terminate the membership of a participating member if the board of trustees determines that the termination is in the best interests of the interindemnity arrangement even though that person has complied with all of the provisions of the trust agreement. A termination may be effected only if at least two-thirds of the members of the board of trustees indicate in writing their decision to terminate. If the board of trustees proposes to
 terminate a member, the member shall have the right to call a special meeting of all participating members in accordance with the rules established by the board of trustees for the purpose of voting on whether or not the member shall be terminated. The member shall not be terminated if at least two-thirds of the participating members present, in person or by proxy, indicate that the member should not be terminated. In the event a member is terminated, the person shall elect either: (i) to request the return of their initial contribution, in which case the contribution shall be repaid and the indemnity coverage shall thereupon terminate as to all claims then pending against the person and in respect to all occurrences prior to the date of the termination of membership. However, in the event the interindemnity arrangement is then providing legal defense services to the person, the interindemnity
 arrangement shall continue to provide those services for a period of 30 days to enable the person to assume their own defense; or (ii) to release all rights to the return of the initial contribution, in which case the indemnity coverage shall continue for the benefit of the member in respect of occurrences during the time the person was a participating member and the person shall have no responsibility for assessments levied following that termination. The interindemnity arrangement may provide that if a member is terminated and fails to make the election set forth herein within 45 days of the date of notification of termination of membership, the participating member shall be deemed to have elected to release all rights to a return of their initial contribution, in which case indemnity coverage shall apply for the benefit of the member with respect to occurrences occurring prior to the termination.

(10) Each member participating in the interindemnity arrangement shall have the right of access to, and the inspection of, the books and records of the interindemnity arrangement, which rights shall be similar to the corporate shareholders pursuant to Section 3003 of the Corporations Code, or, commencing January 1, 1977, Sections 1600 to 1605, inclusive, of the Corporations Code.

(11) There shall be a meeting of all members participating in the interindemnity arrangement, at least annually, after not less than 10 days’ written notice has been given, at a location reasonably convenient to the participating members and on a date that is within a reasonable period of time following the distribution of the annual financial statements.

(12) Notwithstanding Sections 12453 and 12703 of the Corporations Code, on any matter to be voted upon by the membership at either a regular or special meeting, a member shall have the right to vote in person or by written proxy filed with the corporate secretary prior to the meeting. No proxy shall be made irrevocable, nor be valid beyond the earliest of the following dates:

(A) The date of expiration set forth in the proxy.

(B) The date of termination of membership.

(C) Eleven months from the date of execution of the proxy.
